Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-718
Judgment on appeal; certified copy sent to county judge.

After entry of final judgment in the district court on the appeal, a certified copy thereof shall be prepared and transmitted by the clerk of the district court to the county judge.

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 18, p. 456;

Laws 2000, LB 921, § 36.

Clerk of district court is required to certify and transmit to county judge a certified copy of final judgment rendered on appeal. Blecha v. School Dist. of Hebron, 173 Neb. 183, 112 N.W.2d 783 (1962).